Florida, session 2026, SB1506.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âSection 768.74, Florida Statutes, is amended to 16 read: 17 768.74âRemittitur and additur.â 18 (1)âIn any action to which this part applies in which 19 wherein the trier of fact determines that liability exists on 20 the part of the defendant and a verdict is rendered which awards 21 money damages to the plaintiff, it shall be the responsibility 22 of the court must, upon proper motion, to review the amount of 23 the such award to determine whether the if such amount is 24 excessive or inadequate in light of the facts and circumstances 25 that which were presented to the trier of fact. 26 (2)âIf the court finds that the amount awarded is excessive 27 or inadequate, it must shall order a remittitur or additur, as 28 the case may be. 29 (3)âIt is the intent intention of the Legislature that 30 awards of damages be closely scrutinized subject to close 31 scrutiny by the courts and that all such awards be adequate and 32 not excessive. 33 (4)âIf the party adversely affected by such remittitur or 34 additur does not agree, the court must shall order a new trial 35 in the cause on the issue of damages only. 36 (5)âIn determining whether an award is excessive or 37 inadequate in light of the facts and circumstances presented to 38 the trier of fact and in determining the amount, if any, that 39 the such award exceeds a reasonable range of damages or is 40 inadequate, the court shall consider the following criteria: 41 (a)âWhether the amount awarded is indicative of prejudice, 42 passion, or corruption on the part of the trier of fact; 43 (b)âWhether it appears that the trier of fact ignored the 44 evidence in reaching a verdict or misconceived the merits of the 45 case relating to the amounts of damages recoverable; 46 (c)âWhether the trier of fact took improper elements of 47 damages into account or arrived at the amount of damages by 48 speculation and conjecture; 49 (d)âWhether the amount awarded bears a reasonable relation 50 to the amount of damages proved and the injury suffered; and 51 (e)âWhether the amount awarded is supported by the evidence 52 and is such that it could be adduced in a logical manner by 53 reasonable persons; 54 (f)âWhether there is a rational, nonarbitrary connection 55 grounded in the evidence between the injuries suffered and the 56 amount of an award of noneconomic damages; and 57 (g)âWhether the amount of an award of noneconomic damages 58 resulted from references to objects or values that did not have 59 a rational connection to the facts of the case. 60 (6)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to vest the trial 61 courts of this state with the discretionary authority to review 62 the amounts of damages awarded by a trier of fact in light of a 63 standard of excessiveness or inadequacy. The Legislature 64 recognizes that the reasonable actions of a jury are a 65 fundamental precept of American jurisprudence and that such 66 actions should be disturbed or modified with caution and 67 discretion. However, it is further recognized that a review by 68 the courts in accordance with the standards set forth in this 69 section provides an additional element of soundness and logic to 70 our judicial system and is in the best interests of the citizens 71 of this state. 72 Section 2.âThis act applies to causes of action pending on 73 or after July 1, 2026. 74 Section 3.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 75 made by this act to section 768.74, Florida Statutes, in a 76 reference thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of section 77 400.0238, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 78 400.0238âPunitive damages; limitation.â 79 (1) 80 (d)âThis subsection is not intended to prohibit an 81 appropriate court from exercising its jurisdiction under s. 82 768.74 in determining the reasonableness of an award of punitive 83 damages that is less than three times the amount of compensatory 84 damages. 85 Section 4.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 86 made by this act to section 768.74, Florida Statutes, in a 87 reference thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of section 88 429.298, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 89 429.298âPunitive damages; limitation.â 90 (1) 91 (d)âThis subsection is not intended to prohibit an 92 appropriate court from exercising its jurisdiction under s. 93 768.74 in determining the reasonableness of an award of punitive 94 damages that is less than three times the amount of compensatory 95 damages. 96 Section 5.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 97 made by this act to section 768.74, Florida Statutes, in a 98 reference thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of section 99 768.73, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 100 768.73âPunitive damages; limitation.â 101 (1) 102 (d)âThis subsection is not intended to prohibit an 103 appropriate court from exercising its jurisdiction under s. 104 768.74 in determining the reasonableness of an award of punitive 105 damages that is less than three times the amount of compensatory 106 damages. 107 Section 6.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 108 made by this act to section 768.74, Florida Statutes, in a 109 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 110 768.735, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 111 768.735âPunitive damages; exceptions; limitation.â 112 (2) 113 (c)âThis subsection is not intended to prohibit an 114 appropriate court from exercising its jurisdiction under s. 115 768.74 in determining the reasonableness of an award of punitive 116 damages which is less than three times the amount of 117 compensatory damages. 118 Section 7.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.